Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
LIMITED PARTNERS

7-62-301. Admission of limited partners.

After the filing of a limited partnership's original certificate of limited partnership, a person may be admitted as an additional limited partner:

In the case of a person acquiring a partnership interest directly from the limited partnership, upon compliance with the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not so provide, upon the written consent of all partners;

In the case of an assignee of a partnership interest of a partner who has the power, as provided in section 7-62-704, to grant the assignee the right to become a limited partner, upon the exercise of that power and compliance with any conditions limiting the grant or exercise of the power; and

Either upon formation of the limited partnership or thereafter without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited partnership or acquiring a partnership interest, if in either case such admission is pursuant to a written partnership agreement or other writing confirming the admission.

A person becomes a limited partner on the later of:

The date the original certificate of limited partnership is filed in the records of the secretary of state; and

The date reflected in the records of the limited partnership as the date that person becomes a limited partner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 440, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(2) R&RE, p. 453, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2245, § 133, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1130, § 5, effective May 14.

7-62-302. Voting.

Subject to the provisions of section 7-62-303, the partnership agreement may grant to all or a specified group of the limited partners the right to vote (on a per capita or other basis) upon any matter.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 440, § 1, effective November 1.

7-62-303. Liability to third parties.

A limited partner is not liable for the obligations of a limited partnership incurred while it is not a limited liability limited partnership unless the limited partner is also a general partner or, in addition to the exercise of the limited partner's rights and powers as a limited partner, the limited partner participates in the control of the business. However, if the limited partner participates in the control of the business at the time such liability is incurred, the limited partner is liable only to persons who transact business or conduct activities with the limited partnership reasonably believing, notwithstanding the fact that the limited partner is not designated as a general partner in the certificate of limited partnership, based upon the limited partner's conduct, that the limited partner is a general partner at the time such liability is incurred.

A limited partner of a limited liability limited partnership is not liable for the obligations of the partnership incurred while it is a limited liability limited partnership.

A limited partner does not participate in the control of the business within the meaning of subsection (1) of this section solely by doing one or more of the following:

Being a contractor for or an agent or employee of the limited partnership or of a general partner;

Being an officer, director, or shareholder of a corporate general partner;

Consulting with and advising a general partner with respect to the business of the limited partnership;

Acting as surety for the limited partnership or guaranteeing or assuming one or more specific obligations of the limited partnership or providing collateral for an obligation of the limited partnership;

Bringing an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor pursuant to part 10 of this article;

Calling, requesting, or participating in a meeting of the partners;

Proposing or approving or disapproving, by voting or otherwise, one or more of the following matters:

The dissolution and winding up or continuation of the limited partnership;

The sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, pledge, or other transfer of any assets of the limited partnership;

The incurrence of indebtedness by the limited partnership;

A change in the nature of the business;

The admission or removal of a partner;

A transaction or other matter involving an actual or potential conflict of interest;

An amendment to the partnership agreement or certificate of limited partnership; or

Such other matters as are stated in writing in the partnership agreement;

Winding up the limited partnership pursuant to section 7-62-803; or

Exercising any right or power permitted to limited partners under this article and not specifically enumerated in this subsection (2).

The enumeration in subsection (2) of this section does not mean that the possession or exercise of any other powers by a limited partner constitutes participation by the limited partner in the business of the limited partnership.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 440, § 1, November 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended and (2) R&RE, p. 453, §§ 15, 16, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended and (4) repealed, pp. 1499, 1500, §§ 4, 5, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2245, § 134, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (3) amended, p. 1442, § 130, effective July 1.

7-62-304. Person erroneously believing self to be a limited partner.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who makes a contribution to a business enterprise and erroneously, but in good faith, believes that the person has become a limited partner in the enterprise is not a general partner in the enterprise and is not bound by its obligations by reason of making the contribution, receiving distributions from the enterprise, or exercising any rights of a limited partner, if, on ascertaining the mistake, the person causes an appropriate certificate of limited partnership or a certificate of amendment to be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

A person who makes a contribution of the kind described in subsection (1) of this section is liable as a general partner to any third party who transacts business with the enterprise before an appropriate certificate is filed in the records of the secretary of state to show that the person is not a general partner, but only if the third party actually believed in good faith that the person was a general partner at the time of the transaction.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 441, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(2) amended, p. 454, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1823, § 44, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1687, § 42, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2245, § 135, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1442, § 131, effective July 1.

7-62-305. Information and accounting.

Each limited partner has the right to:

Inspect and copy partnership records, as provided by section 7-62-105; and

Obtain from the general partners from time to time, subject to such reasonable standards as may be stated in the partnership agreement or otherwise established by the general partners, upon reasonable demand for any purpose reasonably related to the limited partner's interest as a limited partner:

True and full information regarding the state of the business and financial condition of the limited partnership and any other information regarding the affairs of the limited partnership; and

Promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited partnership's federal, state, and local income tax returns for each year; and

Have a formal accounting of partnership affairs whenever circumstances render it just and reasonable.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 441, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a) and IP(1)(b) amended, p. 454, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1)(b) amended, p. 2246, § 136, effective July 1, 2004.

7-62-306. Time of admission.

A person acquiring a partnership interest is admitted as a limited partner upon the later to occur of the formation of the limited partnership and the time provided in the partnership agreement or, if no such time is provided, when the person's admission is reflected in the records of the limited partnership.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 454, § 19, effective July 1.